Nevada, session 83, AB581.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $2,929,232 for
the Northern Nevada Correctional Center budget account for an
unanticipated shortfall related to utilities and personnel expenses.
This appropriation is supplemental to that made by section 20 of
chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 1241.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $261,455 for the
Stewart Conservation Camp budget account for an unanticipated
shortfall related to personnel services, utilities and inmate-driven
expenses. This appropriation is supplemental to that made by
section 20 of chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 1241.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $250,794 for the
Pioche Conservation Camp budget account for an unanticipated
shortfall related to personnel services, utilities and inmate-driven
expenses. This appropriation is supplemental to that made by
section 20 of chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 1241.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $222,749 for the
Northern Nevada Transitional Housing budget account for an
unanticipated shortfall related to personnel services, utilities and
inmate-driven expenses. This appropriation is supplemental to that
made by section 20 of chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at
page 1241.
Sec. 5. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $876,707 for the
Three Lakes Valley Conservation Camp budget account for an
unanticipated shortfall related to personnel services, utilities and
inmate-driven expenses. This appropriation is supplemental to that
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
made by section 20 of chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at
page 1241.
Sec. 6. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $5,133,305 for
the Southern Desert Correctional Center budget account for an
unanticipated shortfall related to personnel services, utilities and
inmate-driven expenses. This appropriation is supplemental to that
made by section 20 of chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at
page 1241.
Sec. 7. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $213,574 for the
Jean Conservation Camp budget account for an unanticipated
shortfall related to personnel services and utilities expenses. This
appropriation is supplemental to that made by section 20 of chapter
209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 1241.
Sec. 8. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $3,896,945 for
the Ely State Prison budget account for an unanticipated shortfall
related to personnel services, utilities and inmate-driven expenses.
This appropriation is supplemental to that made by section 20 of
chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 1241.
Sec. 9. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $53,139 for the
Carlin Conservation Camp budget account for an unanticipated
shortfall related to personnel services, maintenance contracts,
utilities and inmate-driven expenses. This appropriation is
supplemental to that made by section 20 of chapter 209, Statutes of
Nevada 2023, at page 1241.
Sec. 10. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $3,217,122 for
the Lovelock Correctional Center budget account for an
unanticipated shortfall related to personnel services and inmate-
driven expenses. This appropriation is supplemental to that made by
section 20 of chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 1241.
Sec. 11. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $3,164,040 for
the Florence McClure Women’s Correctional Center budget account
for an unanticipated shortfall related to personnel services, utilities
and inmate-driven expenses. This appropriation is supplemental to
that made by section 20 of chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at
page 1241.
Sec. 12. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $15,780,715 for
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
the High Desert State Prison budget account for an unanticipated
shortfall related to operating, personnel services, utilities and
inmate-driven expenses. This appropriation is supplemental to that
made by section 20 of chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at
page 1241.
Sec. 13. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $6,378,786 for
the Prison Medical Care budget account for an unanticipated
shortfall related to personnel services, utilities and inmate-driven
expenses. This appropriation is supplemental to that made by
section 20 of chapter 209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 1241.
Sec. 14. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections the sum of $2,363,002 for
the Office of the Director budget account for an unanticipated
shortfall related to personnel services, operating, in-state travel,
information services, training and inmate transportation. This
appropriation is supplemental to that made by section 20 of chapter
209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 1241.
Sec. 15. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)